ASPELL6/portugues/pt_PT.aff
SFX K Y 234
SFX K   ir             o              uir
SFX K   r              o              air
SFX K   r              s              [ua]ir
SFX K   ir             i              [ua]ir
SFX K   0              0ir            [ua]ir
SFX K   0              0ir            [ua]ir
SFX K   ir             em             [ua]ir
SFX K   0              0ir            [ua]ir
SFX K   0              0ir            [ua]ir
SFX K   0              0ir            [ua]ir
SFX K   0              0ir            [ua]ir
SFX K   0              0ir            [ua]ir
SFX K   0              0ir            [ua]ir
SFX K   0              0ir            [ua]ir
SFX K   r              u              [ua]ir
SFX K   0              0ir            [ua]ir
SFX K   0              0ir            [ua]ir
SFX K   0              0ir            [ua]ir
SFX K   0              0ir            [ua]ir
SFX K   0              0ir            [ua]ir
SFX K   0              0ir            [ua]ir
SFX K   0              0ir            [ua]ir
SFX K   0              ei             [ua]ir
SFX K   0                             [ua]ir
SFX K   0                             [ua]ir
SFX K   0              emos           [ua]ir
SFX K   0              eis            [ua]ir
SFX K   0                             [ua]ir
SFX K   ir             a              uir
SFX K   ir             as             uir
SFX K   ir             amos           uir
SFX K   ir             ais            uir
SFX K   ir             am             uir
SFX K   r              a              air
SFX K   r              as             air
SFX K   r              amos           air
SFX K   r              ais            air
SFX K   r              am             air
SFX K   0              0ir            [ua]ir
SFX K   0              0ir            [ua]ir
SFX K   0              0ir            [ua]ir
SFX K   0              0ir            [ua]ir
SFX K   0              0ir            [ua]ir
SFX K   0              0ir            [ua]ir
SFX K   0              mos            [ua]ir
SFX K   0              0ir            [ua]ir
SFX K   0              0ir            [ua]ir
SFX K   0              ia             [ua]ir
SFX K   0              ias            [ua]ir
SFX K   0                             [ua]ir
SFX K   0                             [ua]ir
SFX K   0              iam            [ua]ir
SFX K   0              0ir            [ua]ir
SFX K   r              ndo            [ua]ir
SFX K   0              0ir            [ua]ir
SFX K   0              0ir            [ua]ir
SFX K   0              0ir            [ua]ir
SFX K   0              0ir            [ua]ir
SFX K   r              nho            por
SFX K   0              0or            por
SFX K   0              0or            por
SFX K   r              mos            por
SFX K   r              ndes           por
SFX K   0              0or            por
SFX K   or             unha           por
SFX K   or             unhas          por
SFX K   0              0or            por
SFX K   0              0or            por
SFX K   or             unham          por
SFX K   or             us             por
SFX K   or             useste         por
SFX K   0              0or            por
SFX K   or             usemos         por
SFX K   or             usestes        por
SFX K   or             useram         por
SFX K   or             usera          por
SFX K   or             useras         por
SFX K   or             us             por
SFX K   or             us             por
SFX K   0              ei             por
SFX K   0                             por
SFX K   0                             por
SFX K   0              emos           por
SFX K   0              eis            por
SFX K   0                             por
SFX K   r              nha            por
SFX K   r              nhas           por
SFX K   r              nhamos         por
SFX K   r              nhais          por
SFX K   r              nham           por
SFX K   or             usesse         por
SFX K   or             usesses        por
SFX K   or             us             por
SFX K   or             us             por
SFX K   or             usessem        por
SFX K   or             user           por
SFX K   or             useres         por
SFX K   or             user           por
SFX K   or             usermos        por
SFX K   or             userdes        por
SFX K   or             userem         por
SFX K   0              ia             por
SFX K   0              ias            por
SFX K   0                             por
SFX K   0                             por
SFX K   0              iam            por
SFX K   r              nde            por
SFX K   r              ndo            por
SFX K   r              sto            por
SFX K   r              sta            por
SFX K   r              stos           por
SFX K   r              stas           por
SFX K   0              es             por
SFX K   0              mos            por
SFX K   0              des            por
SFX K   0              em             por
SFX K   0              0zer           fazer
SFX K   r              s              fazer
SFX K   zer            z              fazer
SFX K   r              mos            fazer
SFX K   r              is             fazer
SFX K   r              m              fazer
SFX K   er             ia             fazer
SFX K   er             ias            fazer
SFX K   0              0er            fazer
SFX K   0              0er            fazer
SFX K   er             iam            fazer
SFX K   azer           iz             fazer
SFX K   azer           izeste         fazer
SFX K   azer           ez             fazer
SFX K   azer           izemos         fazer
SFX K   azer           izestes        fazer
SFX K   azer           izeram         fazer
SFX K   azer           izera          fazer
SFX K   azer           izeras         fazer
SFX K   azer           iz             fazer
SFX K   azer           iz             fazer
SFX K   zer            rei            fazer
SFX K   zer            r              fazer
SFX K   zer            r              fazer
SFX K   zer            remos          fazer
SFX K   zer            reis           fazer
SFX K   zer            r              fazer
SFX K   0              0zer           fazer
SFX K   0              0zer           fazer
SFX K   0              0zer           fazer
SFX K   0              0zer           fazer
SFX K   0              0zer           fazer
SFX K   azer           izesse         fazer
SFX K   azer           izesses        fazer
SFX K   azer           iz             fazer
SFX K   azer           iz             fazer
SFX K   azer           izessem        fazer
SFX K   azer           izer           fazer
SFX K   azer           izeres         fazer
SFX K   azer           izer           fazer
SFX K   azer           izermos        fazer
SFX K   azer           izerdes        fazer
SFX K   azer           izerem         fazer
SFX K   zer            ria            fazer
SFX K   zer            rias           fazer
SFX K   zer            r              fazer
SFX K   zer            r              fazer
SFX K   zer            riam           fazer
SFX K   r              i              fazer
SFX K   r              ndo            fazer
SFX K   zer            eito           fazer
SFX K   zer            eita           fazer
SFX K   zer            eitos          fazer
SFX K   zer            eitas          fazer
SFX K   0              es             fazer
SFX K   0              mos            fazer
SFX K   0              des            fazer
SFX K   0              em             fazer
SFX K   zer            go             dizer
SFX K   r              s              dizer
SFX K   zer            z              dizer
SFX K   r              mos            dizer
SFX K   r              is             dizer
SFX K   r              m              dizer
SFX K   er             ia             dizer
SFX K   er             ias            dizer
SFX K   0              0er            dizer
SFX K   0              0er            dizer
SFX K   er             iam            dizer
SFX K   zer            sse            dizer
SFX K   zer            sseste         dizer
SFX K   zer            sse            dizer
SFX K   zer            ssemos         dizer
SFX K   zer            ssestes        dizer
SFX K   zer            sseram         dizer
SFX K   zer            ssera          dizer
SFX K   zer            sseras         dizer
SFX K   zer            ss             dizer
SFX K   zer            ss             dizer
SFX K   zer            rei            dizer
SFX K   zer            r              dizer
SFX K   zer            r              dizer
SFX K   zer            remos          dizer
SFX K   zer            reis           dizer
SFX K   zer            r              dizer
SFX K   zer            ga             dizer
SFX K   zer            gas            dizer
SFX K   zer            gamos          dizer
SFX K   zer            gais           dizer
SFX K   zer            gam            dizer
SFX K   zer            ssesse         dizer
SFX K   zer            ssesses        dizer
SFX K   zer            ss             dizer
SFX K   zer            ss             dizer
SFX K   zer            ssessem        dizer
SFX K   zer            sser           dizer
SFX K   zer            sseres         dizer
SFX K   zer            sser           dizer
SFX K   zer            ssermos        dizer
SFX K   zer            sserdes        dizer
SFX K   zer            sserem         dizer
SFX K   zer            ria            dizer
SFX K   zer            rias           dizer
SFX K   zer            r              dizer
SFX K   zer            r              dizer
SFX K   zer            riam           dizer
SFX K   r              i              dizer
SFX K   r              ndo            dizer
SFX K   zer            to             dizer
SFX K   zer            ta             dizer
SFX K   zer            tos            dizer
SFX K   zer            tas            dizer
SFX K   0              es             dizer
SFX K   0              mos            dizer
SFX K   0              des            dizer
SFX K   0              em             dizer
SFX K   0              0ar            ar
SFX K   0              0er            er

SFX B Y 2
SFX B   r              damente        [ia]r
SFX B   er             idamente       er

SFX o Y 4
SFX o   r              dela           [ai]r
SFX o   r              delas          [ai]r
SFX o   er             idela          er
SFX o   er             idelas         er

SFX y Y 4
SFX y   o              eiro           o
SFX y   o              eiros          o
SFX y   a              eira           a
SFX y   a              eiras          a

SFX w Y 20
SFX w   0              so             o
SFX w   0              sa             o
SFX w   0              sos            o
SFX w   0              sas            o
SFX w   a              oso            a
SFX w   a              osa            a
SFX w   a              osos           a
SFX w   a              osas           a
SFX w   0              0              ÇÃo
SFX w   0              0              ÇÃo
SFX w   0              0              ÇÃo
SFX w   0              0              ÇÃo
SFX w   e              oso            e
SFX w   e              osa            e
SFX w   e              osos           e
SFX w   e              osas           e
SFX w   0              oso            [^aeiou]
SFX w   0              osa            [^aeiou]
SFX w   0              osos           [^aeiou]
SFX w   0              osas           [^aeiou]
